Wyoming, session 2026, HB0041.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 9-3-613 by creating a new subsection
(d) is amended to read:
9-3-613. Payment on death; duty related.
(d) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this
section, if a member of the retirement program is killed in
the line of duty, any surviving spouse of the member shall
receive a monthly death benefit payment of ninety percent
(90%) of the member's salary, plus six percent (6%) of that
salary for each child under the age of eighteen (18).
Section 2. This act shall apply to the distribution
of death benefits subject to this act made on or after the
effective date of this act.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0041
ENROLLED ACT NO. 26, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2